zh-TW: 木箱鼓響線系統類型: 可調式響弦 (弦線); 可調式響弦 (金屬線); 鈴鐺/鈴鼓 (沙沙聲); 雙響弦系統; 固定響弦 (金屬線); 吉他弦響弦; 無響弦 (傳統/秘魯式); 可拆式響弦系統; 響弦 (弦線); 其他
cs: Typ virblového systému cajonu: Nastavitelné struny struníku; Nastavitelné dráty struníku; Zvonky/rolničky (sizzle); Dvojitý systém struníku; Pevné dráty struníku; Struník z kytarových strun; Bez struníku (tradiční/peruánský); Odnímatelný systém struníku; Struny struníku; Jiný
pt-BR: Tipo de sistema da caixa do cajon: Cordas de esteira ajustáveis; Fios de esteira ajustáveis; Sino/guizo (efeito sizzle); Sistema duplo de esteira; Fios de esteira fixos; Esteira com cordas de violão; Sem esteira (tradicional/peruano); Sistema de esteira removível; Cordas de esteira; Outro
sl-SI: Vrsta sistema snare cajona: Prilagodljive strune strunika; Prilagodljive žice strunika; Zvončki/krilca; Dvojni sistem strunika; Fiksne žice strunika; Strunik s kitarskimi strunami; Brez strunika (tradicionalni/perujski); Odstranljiv sistem strunika; Strune strunika; Drugo
ja: カホンスネアシステムタイプ: 調整可能なスネアストリングス; 調整可能なスネアワイヤー; ベル/ジングル (シズル); デュアルスネアシステム; 固定スネアワイヤー; ギターストリングスネア; スネアなし (トラディショナル/ペルービアン); 着脱式スネアシステム; スネアストリングス; その他
pl: Typ systemu sprężyn cajonu: Regulowane struny werblowe; Regulowane sprężyny werblowe; Dzwonki/talerzyki (sizzle); Podwójny system sprężyn; Stałe sprężyny werblowe; Struny gitarowe; Brak sprężyn (tradycyjny/peruwiański); Zdejmowany system sprężyn; Struny werblowe; Inne
sk-SK: Typ systému malého bubna cajonu: Nastaviteľné struny; Nastaviteľné lanká strunníka; Zvončeky/rolničky (sizzle); Dvojitý strunník; Pevné lanká strunníka; Gitarové struny; Bez strunníka (tradičný/peruánsky); Odnímateľný strunník; Strunník; Iné
it: sistema di rullante cajon: Corde della cordiera regolabili; Fili della cordiera regolabili; Campanello/sonaglio (sizzle); Sistema a doppia cordiera; Fili della cordiera fissi; Cordiera con corde di chitarra; Senza cordiera (tradizionale/peruviano); Sistema a cordiera rimovibile; Corde della cordiera; Altro
pt-PT: Tipo de sistema de caixa do cajon: Cordas de esteira ajustáveis; Fios de esteira ajustáveis; Sino/guizo (sizzle); Sistema de esteira dupla; Fios de esteira fixos; Esteira de corda de guitarra; Sem esteira (tradicional/peruano); Sistema de esteira amovível; Cordas de esteira; Outro
da: Type af cajon-snaresystem: Justerbare seidingstrenge; Justerbare seidingtråde; Klokke/bjælde (sizzle); Dobbelt seidingsystem; Faste seidingtråde; Guitarstrengs-seiding; Ingen seiding (traditionel/peruviansk); Aftageligt seidingsystem; Seidingstrenge; Andet
en: Cajon snare system type: Adjustable snare strings; Adjustable snare wires; Bell/jingle (sizzle); Dual snare system; Fixed snare wires; Guitar-string snare; No snare (traditional/peruvian); Removable snare system; Snare strings; Other
hr-HR: Vrsta sustava za doboš Cajon: Prilagodljive žice mrežice; Prilagodljive niti mrežice; Zvono/zvončići (sizzle); Sustav s dvije mrežice; Fiksne opruge mrežice; Mrežica od gitarske žice; Bez mrežice (tradicionalni/peruanski); Odvojivi sustav mrežice; Žice mrežice; Ostalo
fr: Type de système de timbre du cajón: Cordes de timbre réglables; Fils de timbre réglables; Cloche/grelots (sizzle); Double système de timbre; Fils de timbre fixes; Timbre à cordes de guitare; Sans timbre (traditionnel/péruvien); Système de timbre amovible; Cordes de timbre; Autre
nb: Cajon skarptrommesystemtype: Justerbare seidingstrenger; Justerbare seidingtråder; Bjelle/tamburin (sizzle); Dobbelt seidingsystem; Faste seidingtråder; Gitarstreng-seiding; Uten seiding (tradisjonell/peruansk); Avtakbart seidingsystem; Seidingstrenger; Annet
th: ประเภทระบบสแนร์ของคาฮอง: สายสแนร์ปรับได้; ลวดสแนร์ปรับได้; กระดิ่ง/ฉาบ (Sizzle); ระบบสแนร์คู่; ลวดสแนร์แบบติดตาย; สแนร์สายกีตาร์; ไม่มีสแนร์ (ดั้งเดิม/เปรู); ระบบสแนร์ถอดได้; สายสแนร์; อื่นๆ
ro-RO: Tip de sistem pentru efectul snare al cajonului: Corzi de premier ajustabile; Fire de premier ajustabile; Clopoței/zurgălăi (sizzle); Sistem dual de premier; Fire de premier fixe; Premier cu corzi de chitară; Fără premier (tradițional/peruvian); Sistem de premier detașabil; Corzi de premier; Altele
lt-LT: Cajon snare sistemos tipas: Reguliuojamos stygos; Reguliuojamos spyruoklės; Varpeliai / žvangučiai („Sizzle“); Dviguba spyruoklių sistema; Fiksuotos spyruoklės; Gitaros stygos; Be spyruoklių (tradicinis / Peru); Nuimama spyruoklių sistema; Stygos; Kita
zh-CN: 卡洪鼓响弦系统类型: 可调响弦琴弦; 可调响弦钢丝; 铃铛/铃片（沙沙声）; 双响弦系统; 固定响弦钢丝; 吉他弦响弦; 无响弦（传统/秘鲁风）; 可拆卸响弦系统; 响弦琴弦; 其他
nl: Cajon snare systeemtype: Verstelbare snare-snaren; Verstelbare snarenmat; Bel/schel (sizzle); Dubbel snare-systeem; Vaste snarenmat; Gitaarsnaar-snare; Geen snare (traditioneel/Peruviaans); Verwijderbaar snare-systeem; Snare-snaren; Overig
tr: Cajon trampet sistemi tipi: Ayarlanabilir trampet telleri; Ayarlanabilir trampet yayları; Zil/çıngırak (cızırtı); Çift trampet sistemi; Sabit trampet yayları; Gitar teli trampet; Trampet yok (geleneksel/peru); Çıkarılabilir trampet sistemi; Trampet telleri; Diğer
es: Tipo de sistema de bordonera del cajón: Cuerdas de bordonera ajustables; Hilos de bordonera ajustables; Campana/cascabel (sonido siseante); Sistema de bordonera doble; Hilos de bordonera fijos; Bordonera de cuerdas de guitarra; Sin bordonera (tradicional/peruana); Sistema de bordonera extraíble; Cuerdas de bordonera; Otro
sv: Typ av cajonvirveltrumma: Justerbara sejarsträngar; Justerbara sejarmattor; Klocka/bjällra (sizzle); Dubbelt sejarsystem; Fasta sejarmattor; Sejare med gitarrsträngar; Utan sejare (traditionell/peruansk); Avtagbart sejarsystem; Sejarsträngar; Övrigt
de: Typ des Cajón-Snare-Systems: Einstellbare Snare-Saiten; Einstellbare Snare-Teppiche; Schellen/Jingles (Sizzle); Duales Snare-System; Feste Snare-Teppiche; Gitarrensaiten-Snare; Keine Snare (Traditionell/Peruanisch); Abnehmbares Snare-System; Snare-Saiten; Sonstige
ru: Тип снейр-системы кахона: Регулируемые струны; Регулируемые пружины; С бубенцами; Двойной подструнник; Фиксированные пружины; Гитарные струны; Без подструнника (традиционный / перуанский); Съемный подструнник; Струны; Другое
el: Τύπος συστήματος παγίδευσης του cajon: Ρυθμιζόμενες χορδές snare; Ρυθμιζόμενα σύρματα snare; Καμπανάκι/ντέφι (sizzle); Διπλό σύστημα snare; Σταθερά σύρματα snare; Χορδές κιθάρας ως snare; Χωρίς snare (παραδοσιακό/περουβιανό); Αφαιρούμενο σύστημα snare; Χορδές snare; Άλλο
bg-BG: Тип на снър системата на кахона: Регулируеми струни; Регулируеми пружини; Звънци/дайре (sizzle); Двойна система пружини; Фиксирани пружини; Струни от китара; Без пружини (традиционен/перуански); Подвижна система пружини; Струни за кахон; Други
vi: Loại hệ thống snare của Cajon: Dây snare có thể điều chỉnh; Dải lò xo có thể điều chỉnh; Chuông/chuông nhỏ (âm xì xèo); Hệ thống snare kép; Dải lò xo cố định; Snare dây guitar; Không có snare (truyền thống/Peru); Hệ thống snare tháo rời được; Dây snare; Khác
ko: 카혼 스네어 시스템 유형: 조정 가능한 스네어 스트링; 조정 가능한 스네어 와이어; 벨/징글(시즐); 듀얼 스네어 시스템; 고정 스네어 와이어; 기타 스트링 스네어; 스네어 없음(전통/페루식); 분리형 스네어 시스템; 스네어 스트링; 기타
fi: Cajon-virvelijärjestelmän malli: Säädettävät mattokielet; Säädettävät mattolangat; Kulkunen/kellot (sizzle); Kaksoismattojärjestelmä; Kiinteät mattolangat; Kitarankielimatto; Ei mattoa (perinteinen/perulainen); Irrotettava mattojärjestelmä; Mattokielet; Muu
hu: Cajón pergőrendszer típusa: Állítható sodronykötél; Állítható sodronyszál; Csengő/csörgő (sizzle); Kettős sodronyrendszer; Rögzített sodronyszálak; Gitárhúr sodrony; Nincs sodrony (hagyományos/perui); Eltávolítható sodronyrendszer; Sodronykötelek; Egyéb